California statutes. Public Resources Code
 and conditions of the solid waste facilities permit
 imposed by an enforcement agency pursuant to this section shall be
 consistent with the enforcement policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 43209 and shall be consistent with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 509, Sec. 5.   (AB 1398)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

44014.

(a) Upon compliance with Sections 44007, 44008, and 44009, and after any necessary hearing, the local enforcement agency shall issue, modify, or revise a solid waste facilities permit if the board has concurred in that issuance, modification, or revision of the permit pursuant to Section 44009.

(b) The permit shall contain all terms and conditions which the enforcement agency determines to be appropriate for the operation of the solid waste facility. The operator shall comply with all terms and conditions of the permit.

(c) Within 15 days of issuing, modifying, or revising a solid waste facilities permit, the enforcement agency shall transmit to the permittee a copy of the solid waste facilities permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 25.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44015.

A solid waste facilities permit issued or revised under this chapter shall be reviewed and, if necessary, revised at least once every five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44016.

(a) The enforcement agency may, in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 44300), suspend or revoke the permit of any solid waste facility designed to convert solid waste from offsite sources into energy or synthetic fuels if the facility utilizes recyclable materials for conversion to energy and if the local agency in whose jurisdiction the materials are collected requires, by ordinance, contract, or otherwise, that recyclable materials within the jurisdiction of that local agency be converted into energy at that facility. This subdivision does not otherwise restrict the ability of a solid waste facility to purchase, collect, transport, or process recyclable materials.

(b) As used in this section, “local agency” means any county, city, or district authorized to collect, dispose, or collect and dispose of solid waste, or any joint powers authority formed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code which is authorized to construct and operate a facility for the conversion of solid waste into energy, synthetic fuel, or reusable materials.

(c) As used in this section, “recyclable materials” means discarded paper, glass, cardboard, plastic, ferrous metal, or aluminum which has been segregated from other solid waste materials for the purpose of reuse or recycling, except that recyclable materials do not include materials which a local agency, having jurisdiction over the locations where these materials exist, determines could be potentially harmful to the public health, or materials which create a public nuisance, as defined in Section 3480 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 27.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44017.

The enforcement agency shall include, in the permit of any solid waste facility designed to convert solid waste into energy or synthetic fuels, a provision which requires the use of operating procedures at the facility to prevent hazardous waste from entering the conversion process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 28.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44018.

The board shall establish, by regulation, a program to be implemented by the board and by local enforcement agencies that provides for the expedited review of permits issued pursuant to this article. The program shall be designed to reduce unnecessary delay in the issuance of these permits and to protect the public health and safety and the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 29.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

44019.

(a) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) “Agricultural byproduct material” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (4.5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) “Agricultural facility” means an area where land is actively used for agricultural operations and includes related commercial activities and structures
 necessary for these operations if they are consistent with accepted practices and local zoning.

(3) “Agricultural material” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) “Large-scale biomass management event” includes, but is not limited to, the removal of a whole orchard or vineyard.

(5) “Manure” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

 (b) The following
 activities are excluded activities for purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 17855 of Title 14 of the California Code of
 Regulations:

(1) (A) Composting green material, agricultural material, food material, and vegetative food material activities, alone or in combination, if the total amount of feedstock and compost onsite at any one time does not exceed
 either of the following:

(i) 200 cubic yards.

(ii) 500 cubic yards for a composting activity owned by a public agency. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “public agency” means a city, county, city and county, including a charter city or charter county, special district, joint powers authority, state agency, or federal agency.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the department may increase, by regulation, the total amount of feedstock and compost a composting activity may have
 onsite as an excluded activity.

(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (C), the composting of agricultural materials and residues that are from a large-scale biomass management event at an agricultural facility that does not otherwise operate as a solid waste facility. Materials or residues from a large-scale biomass management event do not include whole or partial animal carcasses or animal byproducts other than manure. 

(B) (i) The excluded activity described in subparagraph (A) may
 include acquiring and using agricultural materials, agricultural byproduct materials, and manure from an agricultural facility to blend with the onsite agricultural materials and residues resulting from a large-scale biomass management event. Offsite material shall not include whole or partial animal carcasses or animal byproducts other than manure.

(ii) An entity that acquires and uses agricultural materials, agricultural byproduct materials, or manure pursuant to clause (i) shall
 maintain records identifying the origin of the material or manure for a minimum of five years and present those records to enforcement agencies upon request.

(C) The excluded activity described in this paragraph may be excluded activity for purposes of Section 17855 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations not more than once every 10 years and the composting of materials shall not exceed 24 months.

(c) Persons handling compostable material under the exclusions described in subdivision
 (b) are obligated to obtain all permits, licenses, or other clearances that may be required by other regulatory agencies including, but not limited to, local health entities and local land use authorities.

(d) (1) A composting activity may give away or sell up to 5,000 cubic yards of compost product annually for purposes of both of the following:

(A) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17855 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 17856 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may increase, by regulation, the amount a composting activity may give away or sell when the composting is of agricultural materials and residues that are from a large-scale biomass management event at an agricultural facility pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.   (SB 279)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Facility Inspections [44100. - 44107.]

44100.

(a) The enforcement agency, in issuing or reviewing a solid waste facilities permit or in connection with an action relating to a solid waste facilities permit or as otherwise authorized by this division, may investigate the operation of a solid waste facility, a transfer or processing station, a disposal site, collection or handling equipment, or a storage area for solid wastes.

(b) In the investigation, the enforcement agency may require a person, who is, or proposes to become, an operator of a solid waste facility, a transfer or processing station, a disposal site, collection or handling equipment, or a storage area for solid wastes, or a person that the enforcement agency believes may have information concerning a suspected violation of this division, to furnish, under penalty of perjury, any nonprivileged technical or monitoring program or other reports that the enforcement agency may specify.

(c) If the owner of property upon which solid waste is unlawfully stored, stockpiled, disposed, handled, or maintained refuses to allow or provide the board, the enforcement agency, or a contractor of the board or enforcement agency with access to enter onto the property and perform all necessary cleanup, abatement, or remedial work as authorized pursuant to Section 45000 or 48020, the court may issue the board, the enforcement agency, or a contractor of the board or enforcement agency a warrant pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure to permit reasonable access to the property to perform that activity, if the following conditions have been met:

(1) An administrative order requiring corrective action has been issued or obtained pursuant to Section 45000 against the property owner.

(2) The board or enforcement agency finds that there is a significant threat to public health or the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44101.

(a) In the investigation, the enforcement agency may inspect the facility, equipment, or vehicle used for storage, collection, transportation, processing, or disposal of solid waste, as necessary to ensure compliance with this division and to determine that the terms and conditions of solid waste facilities permits are being complied with.

(b) The inspection shall be made with the consent of the owner or possessor of the solid waste facilities permit or, if consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, in the event of an emergency affecting the public health or safety, an inspection may be made without consent or the issuance of a warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44103.

(a) For those facilities that accept only hazardous wastes, or that accept only low-level radioactive wastes, or that accept both, a solid waste facilities permit issued by the enforcement agency is not required. A single hazardous waste facilities permit or low-level radioactive waste facilities permit issued by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 25200) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, or by the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 114960) of Part 9 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code shall be the only waste facilities permit or permits necessary for the use and operation of hazardous waste or low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

(b) For those facilities that accept both hazardous wastes and other solid wastes, two permits shall be required, as follows:

(1) The hazardous waste facilities permit issued by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 25200) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The solid waste facilities permit issued by the enforcement agency pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this section limits or supersedes any other permit or licensing requirements imposed by other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 343, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44104.

(a) The board shall maintain an inventory of solid waste facilities which violate state minimum standards. To the extent it is practicable to do so, the board shall incorporate in this inventory existing information collected in the course of previous surveys of this type and similar information made available to the board by state and local agencies.

(b) Whenever a solid waste facility is proposed to be included in the inventory, the board shall give notice thereof by certified mail to the disposal site owner and the operator of the solid waste facility. If, within 90 days of that notice, the violation has not been corrected, the solid waste facility shall be included in the inventory. The board shall update and publish the inventory twice annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

44106.

(a) The enforcement agency shall develop a compliance schedule for a solid waste facility included in the inventory prepared pursuant to Section 44104. The compliance schedule shall ensure that diligent progress will be made to bring the solid waste facility into compliance.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), if the solid waste facility is not in compliance with the schedule established by the enforcement agency, the enforcement agency may revoke the operating permit of the solid waste facility until the violations of state minimum standards are remedied. If a closed or abandoned disposal site is not in compliance within the one-year period, the unremedied condition is prima facie evidence of negligence; and, in any action for damages against the owner of the property for injury caused by the unremedied condition, the burden of proving that the injury was not caused by the unremedied condition shall be on the owner of the property.

(c) The enforcement agency may recover any costs incurred pursuant to this section by charging the fee authorized by Section 43213.

(d) The enforcement agency shall refer violations of a waste discharge requirement adopted under Section 13263 of the Water Code to the appropriate regional water board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1041, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

44107.

(a) A solid waste facility, as defined in Section 40194, sending materials to a biomass conversion facility, shall ensure that the materials are limited to those listed in subdivision (a) of Section 40106. The enforcement agency may inspect solid waste facilities and operations for compliance with this section.

(b) On or before April 1, 2016, and on or before April 1 of each year thereafter, the operator or owner of a biomass conversion facility shall provide an annual report to the department, in writing, for the preceding year, containing all of the following information:

(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the facility, the operator, and the
 owner.

(2) The total amount and type of material accepted by the facility.

(3) The name and address, or the physical location, of the source of each type of material accepted by the facility. A facility that cannot provide the name and address, or the physical location, of a source of material accepted by the facility shall provide an explanation why the information is not available.

(4) The total amount and type of material that was rejected by the facility.

(5) The name and address, or physical location, of the source of each type of material rejected by the facility and the reasons for the rejection. A facility that cannot provide the name and address, or the physical location, of a source of material rejected by the facility shall provide an
 explanation why the information is not available.

(6) The name and address, or physical location, of the final end user of ash or other byproducts produced by the facility. Until January 1, 2017, a facility that cannot provide the name and address, or physical location, of the final end user of ash or byproducts shall provide an explanation why that information is not available.

(7) Signatures of the operator and owner of the facility certifying the accuracy of the information provided under the penalty of perjury.

(8) Any other information that is necessary for the department to determine the accuracy of the information provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) To the extent that information specified in subdivision (b) has previously been submitted
 by the owner or operator of a biomass conversion facility in reports to another state agency or instrument of a state agency, the owner or operator of the facility may submit those reports to the department in satisfaction of the requirements of subdivision (b) regarding that information. Information required by subdivision (b) and not contained in the previously submitted reports shall be provided separately to the department.

(d) If information provided by a biomass conservation facility pursuant to this section is designated as confidential, the department shall treat that information in accordance with Section 40062 and its implementing regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 441.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Other Requirements [44150. - 44152.]

44150.

(a) The enforcement agency shall not issue or revise a solid waste facilities permit for any proposed project which proposes to use transformation, as defined in Section 40201, unless the project complies with all of the following conditions:

(1) The proposed project meets all of the requirements specified in this chapter.

(2) The proposed project is consistent with state solid waste management policy as set forth in Section 40051.

(3) The proposed project has a defined source of waste, including waste available from existing solid waste transfer and processing stations.

(4) The proposed project is guaranteed, by contract or other commitments, more than sufficient quantities of waste to maintain the project’s economic feasibility for the life of the bonded indebtedness of the project. This guarantee shall not include any materials which will be recycled pursuant to paragraph (5).

(5) The proposed project, and any contracts or commitments the project has entered into for the provision of waste, uses front-end recycling methods or programs to remove all recyclable materials from the waste stream prior to transformation to the maximum extent feasible.

(6) If the proposed project is a thermal powerplant, the thermal powerplant has been specifically included in an adopted and approved revision of the countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan prepared pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 41750) of Part 2.

(7) The ash or other residue generated from the transformation project is routinely tested at least once a month, and, notwithstanding Section 25143.5 of the Health and Safety Code, if hazardous wastes are present, the ash or residue is sent to a Class 1 hazardous waste disposal facility.

(b) Facilities for the recovery of methane gas are not subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44151.

Any solid waste facility, located outside of any city, shall be maintained in compliance with the flammable clearance provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4371) of Part 2 of Division 4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44152.

No enforcement agency shall issue or revise a permit for a solid waste facility which exclusively uses transformation until the board has concluded in writing that the proposed permit is consistent with the state’s minimum standards for solid waste facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1355, Sec. 39.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Development of Solid Waste Management Facilities on Indian Country [44201. - 44210.]

44201.

As used in this article, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Indian country” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(b) “Tribe” means an Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community, or a tribal agency authorized by a tribe as defined herein, which is recognized as eligible for special programs and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians and is identified on pages 52829 to 52835, inclusive, of Number 250 of Volume 53 (December 29, 1988) of the Federal Register, as that list may be updated or amended from time to time.

(c) “Solid waste” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 40191.

(d) “Solid waste facility” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 40194.

(e) “Operator” means a person who operates a solid waste facility.

(f) “Owner” means a person who owns a solid waste facility.

(g) “Secretary” means the Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(h) “State” means the State of California and any agency or instrumentality thereof.

(i) “Siting” means the physical suitability of a location proposed for a solid waste facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44202.

(a) Upon receipt of a written request from any tribe considering a proposal to construct each solid waste facility in that tribe’s Indian country within this state, the secretary shall convene negotiations for purposes of reaching a cooperative agreement pursuant to this article, which will define the respective rights, duties, and obligations of the state and the tribe concerning the approval, development, and operation of the facility. In convening the negotiations, the secretary shall consult with the California Integrated Waste Management Board, the State Water Resources Control Board, the appropriate California regional water quality control board, the State Air Resources Board, and the appropriate air pollution control district or air quality management district.

(b) This article does not apply to any facility located on Indian country within the state if it meets all of the following requirements: 

(1) The facility is owned and operated solely by a tribe. 

(2) All solid waste accepted by the facility is generated by that particular tribe. 

(3) Appropriate federal agencies have approved the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44203.

(a) The secretary may enter into any cooperative agreement which meets the requirements of this article.

(b) Each cooperative agreement shall include, but shall not be limited to, all requirements determined to be necessary to meet the requirements of subdivision (e) to do all of the following:

(1) Protect water quality, as determined by the State Water Resources Control Board or the appropriate California regional water quality control board.

(2) Protect air quality, as determined by the State Air Resources Board or the appropriate air pollution control officer.

(3) Provide for proper management of solid wastes, as determined necessary by the California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(4) In making these determinations, the state agencies shall consider any applicable federal environmental and public health and safety laws.

(c) A decision by the secretary whether to enter into a cooperative agreement shall be based on a good faith determination concerning whether a proposed cooperative agreement meets the requirements of this article. The secretary shall take this action within 130 days of a written request by the tribe that the secretary approve a draft cooperative agreement. At least 60 days prior to determining whether to enter into a cooperative agreement, the secretary shall provide notice, and make available for public review and comment, drafts of his or her proposed action and drafts of the findings and determinations that are required by this section. The secretary shall hold a public hearing in the affected area on the proposed action within the time period for taking that action, as specified in this section. Within 10 days after the close of the public review and comment period, the agencies shall complete the determinations required by this section and the secretary shall issue a final decision.

(d) The findings and determinations of the secretary and relevant agencies made pursuant to this section shall explain material differences between state laws and regulations and the proposed tribal or federal functionally equivalent provisions. The findings and determinations do not need to explain each difference between the state and tribal or federal requirements as long as they identify and evaluate whether the material differences meet the requirements of this article, including, but not limited to, providing at least as much protection for public health and safety and the environment as would the state requirements.

(e) Any cooperative agreement executed pursuant to this article shall provide for regulation of the solid waste facility through inclusion in the agreement of design, permitting, construction, siting, operation, monitoring, inspection, closure, postclosure, liability, enforcement, and other regulatory provisions applicable to a solid waste facility, or which relate to any environmental consequences that may be caused by facility construction or operation, that are functionally equivalent to all of the following:

(1) Article 4 (commencing with Section 13260) of Chapter 4 of, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13300) of, and Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13370) of, Division 7 of the Water Code.

(2) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 41700) of, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 42300) of, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 42700) of, Part 4 of, and Part 6 (commencing with Section 44300) of, Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) This division.

(4) All regulations adopted pursuant to the statutes specified in this section.

(5) Any other provision of state environmental, public health, and safety laws and regulations germane to the solid waste facility proposed by the tribe.

(f) The tribal organizational structures or other means of implementing the requirements specified in subdivision (e) are not required to be the same as the state organizational structures or means of implementing its system of regulation.

(g) Neither the approval of any cooperative agreement nor amendments to the agreement, nor any determination of sufficiency provided in Section 44205, shall constitute a “project” as defined in Section 21065 and shall not be subject to review pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(h) Each cooperative agreement shall provide for the incorporation of the standards and requirements germane to the protection of the environment, public health, and safety listed in subdivision (e), as enacted, or as those provisions may be amended after January 1, 1992, or after the effective date of any cooperative agreement, if those standards and requirements meet both of the following requirements:

(1) The standards and requirements do not discriminate against a tribe which has executed a cooperative agreement, or a lessee of the tribe, and are applicable to, or not more stringent than, other rules applicable to other similar or analogous facilities or operations outside Indian country.

(2) Adequate notice and opportunity for comment on the incorporation of new and amended standards or requirements are provided to the tribe, facility owner, and operator to facilitate any physical or operational changes in the facility in accordance with state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44204.

(a) A tribe shall be eligible for technical assistance to the extent feasible, from the agencies specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44203, for the design, establishment, and implementation of a permit system, cooperative monitoring programs, a tribal enforcement system, and implementation of any other regulatory requirement. 

(b) Each cooperative agreement shall provide for reasonable compensation to relevant state agencies for costs and expenses incurred by the state in connection with technical assistance provided to the tribe for the regulatory activities provided in this article, including, but not limited to, monitoring, enforcement, permitting, review, and other activities described in this article, and the reviews required by Section 44203, on a nondiscriminatory basis when compared with similar services to similar projects outside of Indian country. 

(c) Each cooperative agreement shall provide for the sharing of appropriate data and other information between any tribal regulatory body, any federal agency, the owner or operator, and applicable state agencies, including, but not limited to, all monitoring data collected respecting the solid waste facility. The agreement shall provide for confidentiality of privileged, proprietary, or trade secret information. 

(d) Each cooperative agreement shall include a dispute resolution mechanism for addressing issues of contract interpretation arising out of the cooperative agreement.

(e) The parties to a cooperative agreement executed pursuant to this article may mutually agree to modifications of time periods for actions which are required by this article, except the time periods provided for public notice, review, and comment shall not be eliminated or reduced. 

(f) Each cooperative agreement shall require the relevant state agencies to provide detailed comments regarding completeness within 30 days after receiving copies of applications filed for tribal and applicable federal permits with respect to the deficiencies, if any, of the application with respect to the state standards identified in Section 44203. The failure of any of these state agencies to provide those comments within that period shall be deemed a finding of completeness of the respective applications. 

(g) Each cooperative agreement shall provide for reasonable access by state agency personnel to Indian country governed by a tribe which has executed a cooperative agreement pursuant to this article for purposes of assistance with permit application review, inspection, and monitoring of operation of a solid waste facility. The cooperative agreement shall also provide for reasonable access for purposes of permit application review and inspection, to the extent the state can provide that access, by tribal regulatory authorities to transfer stations, or similar facilities, located outside of Indian country and handling waste to be transferred to tribal lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44205.

(a) Each cooperative agreement shall require the public agencies specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44203 to review any draft tribal permit and any applicable federal permit to determine whether it contains all conditions sufficient to do all of the following:

(1) Meet the functionally equivalent standards provided in the cooperative agreement, as required by subdivision (e) of Section 44203.

(2) Provide not less than the level of protection for public health, safety, and the environment that would have been the case if that state agency had issued the permit.

(3) Implement all feasible mitigation measures. For purposes of this paragraph, “feasible” has the same meaning as in Sections 21001, 21002.1, and 21004, and any regulations adopted pursuant to those sections.

(b) Each cooperative agreement shall provide that the tribal or federal permits issued for the solid waste facility meet the requirements of this section.

(c) The failure of a party to a cooperative agreement to meet the requirements of this section shall be determined to be an actionable breach of the cooperative agreement.

(d) The election by a party to a cooperative agreement to pursue a contractual remedy shall not limit the ability of a party to assert its respective claims of jurisdiction or sovereign immunity.

(e) Entering into a cooperative agreement shall not be a basis for denying any remedy to which a party is otherwise entitled.

(f) Within 10 days of issuance of a final federal permit or tribal permit, a copy of that permit shall be provided to the California Environmental Protection Agency and the tribe having jurisdiction over the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 152.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44206.

(a) Nothing in this article shall limit or expand, or be construed to limit or expand, the jurisdiction of any state agency specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44203 or any tribal agency with respect to any solid waste facility located in Indian country, including, but not limited to, the enforcement powers and procedures available to the state or any tribe with respect to those facilities to the extent not preempted by federal law, including, but not limited to, powers and procedures contained in state or tribal statutes or regulations. 

(b) The cooperative agreement shall provide that the state may exercise its enforcement powers over any solid waste facility project on Indian country where a cooperative agreement has been executed, subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) A violation or threatened violation of any standard or requirement set forth in Section 44203 or its functional equivalent in the cooperative agreement, or any condition set forth in a cooperative agreement or permit for the facility, has occurred or is occurring. For purposes of this paragraph, “threatened violation” means a condition creating a substantial probability of harm, when the probability and potential extent of harm make it reasonably necessary to take immediate action to prevent, reduce, or mitigate damages to persons, property, or natural resources. 

(2) The violation or violations have been brought to the attention of the tribe and to the owner and operator of the solid waste facility, through written notice from the appropriate agency. The notice shall identify the specific violation or violations which are occurring or have occurred and a specific corrective or enforcement action or range of actions, including sufficient penalties. The notice shall include a specific and reasonable timeframe in which to take appropriate corrective or enforcement action.

(3) The tribe, after receiving the notice, has failed to take the action or actions, or to take other reasonable action to abate or correct the violation or violations, in a reasonable time. 

(c) The functionally equivalent provisions of tribal or federal permits, as determined sufficient pursuant to Section 44205, together with any cooperative agreement approved pursuant to this article, shall collectively be deemed to constitute permits issued under state law for all purposes of enforcing state law. 

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), each of the public agencies specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44203 may immediately exercise its enforcement powers over any solid waste facility project on Indian country where a cooperative agreement has been executed, if, in the judgment of the public agency, immediate state action is required to avoid an imminent and substantial threat to public health and safety or to the environment. The state shall notify the tribe prior to taking any action pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 113, Sec. 3.   Effective July 2, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

44207.

(a) The cooperative agreement shall provide that the state or tribe may bring an appropriate civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the terms of the cooperative agreement as a contract, and shall not limit the availability to either party of any remedy at law or in equity otherwise available under California law. 

(b) The cooperative agreement shall require that the tribe waive its sovereign immunity from any action brought by the state in any court otherwise having jurisdiction over the subject matter, and that the state shall waive its sovereign immunity from any action brought by the tribe, in any court otherwise having jurisdiction over the subject matter, to enforce the terms of the cooperative agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44208.

A cooperative agreement executed pursuant to this article shall be executed for the express benefit of the citizens of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44209.

Any person may commence a civil action on the person’s own behalf against any of the public agencies specified in subdivision (b) of Section 44203, or against the secretary, who is alleged to have approved or certified the sufficiency of any cooperative agreement or permit in violation of this article. No action may be commenced under this section more than 60 days after the agency or secretary has approved or certified the sufficiency of any cooperative agreement or permit under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

44210.

Notwithstanding this article, a cocomposting facility located in Indian country with a memorandum of agreement adopted November 29, 1989, with the California Regional Water Quality Control Board, Colorado River Basin Region 7, shall be allowed to continue to operate under the terms of that agreement until January 1, 1993, or the date the project complies with this article, whichever date is earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Denial, Suspension, or Revocation of Permits [44300. - 44310.]



  ARTICLE 1. Denial of Permits [44300. - 44300.]

44300.

An enforcement agency may, after holding a public hearing before a hearing panel or a hearing officer appointed pursuant to Section 44308 or 44309, in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 44310, deny a solid waste facilities permit in any of the following cases:

(a) The application is incomplete or otherwise inadequate.

(b) The applicant has not complied with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(c) The applicant has failed to demonstrate that the facility will meet minimum regulatory standards.
